parSem/xip/dev/GRAMMARS/FRENCH/APPLICATIONS/ACCENTUATION/FST2/src/norm-phono.xfst
define voyelle	[a | e | i | o | u | y | é] ;
define vraivoyelle	[a | e | i | o | é] ;
define voysanse	[a | i | o | u | y] ;
define lettre	[a | b | c | d | e | f | g | h | i | j | k | l | m | n | o | p | q | r | s | t | u | v | w | x | y | z] ;
define consonne	[b | c | d | f | g | h | j | k | l | m | n | p | q | r | s | t | v | w | x | z] ;
define consSaufH	[b | c | d | f | g | j | k | l | m | n | p | q | r | s | t | v | w | x | z] ;
define consSaufC	[b | d | f | g | h | j | k | l | m | n | p | q | r | s | t | v | w | x | z] ;
define voyellec	[e | i | y | é] ;
define voyellek	[a | u | o] ;
define consonnepb	[p | b] ;


read regex [
[ç] -> [s] 
.o.
[à] -> [a]
.o.
[á] -> [a]
.o.
[â] -> [a]
.o.
[ã] -> [a]
.o.
[ä] -> [a]
.o.
[å] -> [a]
.o.
[æ] -> [a]
.o.
[è] -> [é]
.o.
[ê] -> [é]
.o.
[ë] -> [é]
.o.
[ì] -> [i]
.o.
[í] -> [i]
.o.
[î] -> [i]
.o.
[ï] -> [i]
.o.
[ñ] -> [n i]
.o.
[ò] -> [o]
.o.
[ó] -> [o]
.o.
[ô] -> [o]
.o.
[õ] -> [o]
.o.
[ö] -> [o]
.o.
[ù] -> [u]
.o.
[ú] -> [u]
.o.
[û] -> [u]
.o.
[ü] -> [u]
.o.
[ý] -> [y]
.o.
[ÿ] -> [y]
.o.
[c h] -> [k r] || _r 
.o.
[a y] -> [é i] || _consonne
.o.
[e] -> [é] || _x
.o.
[x c] -> [k s] || _voyellec
.o.
[s] -> [z] || voyelle_voyelle
.o.
[c] -> [s] || _voyellec
.o.
[c u] -> [k] || _e voyelle
.o.
[h] -> [] || .#._voyelle 
.o.
[e t t e] -> [g8]
.o.
[c] -> [k] || o_.#.
.o.
[g8] -> [é t]
.o.
[e t] -> [é]   || _.#.
.o.
[t] -> []  || i_.#. 
.o.
[t] -> []  || a_.#. 
.o.
[t] -> []  || o_.#. 
.o.
[t] -> []  || lettre u_.#. 
.o.
[t] -> []  || n_.#. 
.o.
[s] -> []  || _.#. 
.o.
[d] -> []  || _.#. 
.o.
[e] -> [] || vraivoyelle_.#.
.o.
[s p e c t] -> spect1 || _.#.
.o.
[spect1] -> [s p é]
.o.
[p p] -> [p] 
.o.
[m p] -> [n p] 
.o.
[m b] -> [n b] 
.o.
[c q u] -> [k] 
.o.
[q u] -> k
.o.
[c h] -> [k] || y_o
.o.
[c h] -> [k] || y_a
.o.
[c h] -> [k] || y_i a
.o.
[a i m] -> [g2]  || _consonne
.o.
[a i m] -> [g2] || _.#.
.o.
[g2] -> [i n]
.o.
[e] -> [] || _i n consonne
.o.
[a] -> [] || _i n consonne
.o.
[e] -> [] || _i n.#.
.o.
[a] -> [] || _i n.#.
.o.
[o e u x] -> [e] || _.#.
.o.
[e a u x] -> [o] || _.#.
.o.
[e u x] -> [e] || _.#.
.o.
[a u x] -> [o] || _.#.
.o.
[o e u] -> [e] 
.o.
[e] -> [é] || _r m voyelle
.o.
[e r] -> [é]   || _.#.
.o.
[e l l e] -> [é l] || _.#.
.o.
[e l l e] -> [é l e]
.o.
[e l l] -> [é l]
.o.
[e l] -> [é l] || _.#.
.o.
[e a u] -> [o] 
.o.
[a i t] -> [é]  || _.#.
.o.
[n g] -> [n] || s a_.#.
.o.
[l l] -> [l] || .#.v i_
.o.
[l l] -> [l] || .#.m i_
.o.
[l l] -> [l] || .#.c a p i_
.o.
[l l] -> [l] || .#.d i s t i_
.o.
[l l] -> [l] || .#.i_u
.o.
[l l] -> [l] || .#.i_i
.o.
[l l] -> [l] || .#.i_e
.o.
[l l] -> [l] || .#.i_é
.o.
[a y] -> [é y] 
.o.
[o y] -> [o i y] 
.o.
[i l l] -> [y] || voyelle_
.o.
[i l l] -> [i y]
.o.
[u i l] -> [y] || e_.#.
.o.
[e u] -> [e] 
.o.
[e m] -> [a n] || _consonne
.o.
[m m] -> [m] 
.o.
[u m] -> [u n] || _consonne 
.o.
[o m] -> [o n] || _consonne
.o.
[i e n n] -> [i é n]
.o.
[i e] -> [y i] || _n.#.
.o.
[i e] -> [y i] || _n consonne
.o.
[e n n] -> [g3]
.o.
[g3] -> [é n]
.o.
[g e] -> [j] || _voyelle
.o.
[g g] -> [g] 
.o.
[g] -> [j] || _voyellec
.o.
[g u] -> [g] 
.o.
[e n] -> [a n] || _consonne
.o.
[g e] -> [j] || _voyelle
.o.
[g g] -> [g] 
.o.
[g] -> [j] || _voyellec
.o.
[g u] -> [g] 
.o.
[e n] -> [a n] || _.#.
.o.
[y m] -> [i n]  || _consonne
.o.
[y n] -> [i n] 
.o.
[i m] -> [i n] || _consonne
.o.
[u î] -> [w i] 
.o.
[o ê] -> [w é] 
.o.
[r h] -> [r] 
.o.
[r r] -> [r] 
.o.
[y] -> [i]  || consonne_consonne
.o.
[y] -> [i]  || .#._consonne
.o.
[g n] -> [n i] 
.o.
[s h] -> [c h] 
.o.
[t h] -> [t] 
.o.
[t t] -> [t] 
.o.
[s c] -> [s] || _voyellec
.o.
[e s s] -> [g7]
.o.
[g7] -> [é s]
.o.
[s s] -> [s] 
.o.
[t i o n] -> [s i o n] 
.o.
[b s] -> [p s] 
.o.
[c c] -> [k] 
.o.
[l l] -> [l] 
.o.
[c] -> []  || voyelle_.#. 
.o.
[c] -> [k] || _consSaufH
.o.
[c] -> [k] || _voyellek
.o.
[c k] -> [k] 
.o.
[e f f] -> [g1]
.o.
[g1] -> [é f]
.o.
[f f] -> [f] 
.o.
[p h] -> [f] 
.o.
[d d] -> [d] 
.o.
[b b] -> [b]
.o.
[p t] -> [t] || o n_ 
.o.
[h] -> [] || consSaufC_voyelle 
.o.
[x] -> [z] || i_i
.o.
[x] -> [g z] || e_voyelle
.o.
[x] -> [k s] || voysanse_
.o.
[x] -> [k s] || _consonne
.o.
[x] -> [z] 
.o.
[w] -> [v] || _voyelle  
.o.
[o i] -> [w a] 
.o.
[q] -> [k] 
.o.
[k k] -> [k]
.o.
[o e] -> [e] 
.o.
[o o] -> [o u] 
.o.
[a u] -> [o] 
.o.
[a î] -> [é] 
.o.
[e i] -> [é] 
.o.
[o u i] -> [w i]
.o.
[a i] -> [é] 
.o.
[é e] -> [é] 
.o.
[e z] -> [é]  || _.#.
.o.
[u e] -> [u] || _.#.
.o.
[e] -> [] || consonne_.#. 
.o.
[e] -> [] || y_.#. 
.o.
[n n] -> [n] 
.o.
[y] -> [i]  || consonne_.#.
.o.
[i i] -> [i] 
];

invert net
